Arkansas, session 2025, SB104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that this act shall regulate
the business practices of healthcare payors and pharmacy benefits managers:
(1) To ensure adequate access to pharmacy services as intended
and designed by underlying health benefit plans;
(2) To protect patients from unfair and deceptive trade
practices within the state; and
(3) To ensure pharmacy benefits management companies do not
interfere with a patient's rights under the patient's underlying health
benefit plan and always consider each patient's unique conditions and
limitations when enforcing any access prerequisites or conditions.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-92-503, concerning the definitions used
*ANS087*
04-01-2025 14:34:50 ANS087

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 H4/1/25 SB104
in the Arkansas Pharmacy Benefits Manager Licensure Act, is amended to add
additional subdivisions to read as follows:
(16)(A) "Affiliate" means an entity that controls, is controlled
by, or is under common control with another entity, including an entity in
which control is established through one (1) or more intermediary entities,
such that the common controlling interest may be two (2) or more levels
removed from the specified entity.
(B) Whether an entity is an "affiliate" does not depend on
the percentage or form of ownership interest or any allocation of membership
or ownership between entities, but it is the existence of control or common
control that is the sole determinative factor;
(17)(A) "Carve-out network" means a subset of a pharmacy
benefits manager's network that:
(i) Is created by the pharmacy benefits manager; and
(ii) Limits access to a certain pharmacy or
pharmacist for a specific drug or category of drugs.
(B) "Carve-out network" includes any network that
restricts enrollee access to in-person pharmacy services within this state by
offering only limited methods of obtaining a prescription drug, including
mail-order only options, while presenting the appearance of a full network of
available pharmacies;
(18) "Enrollee" means an individual who is entitled to receive
healthcare services under the terms of a health benefit plan;
(19)(A) "Ghost network" means a pharmacy benefits manager
network that includes a pharmacy or pharmacist as a participating provider
when that participating provider is:
(i) Not accepting new patients;
(ii) No longer in practice; or
(iii) Otherwise unavailable to or restricted from
providing services to enrollees in this state.
(B) "Ghost network" includes a pharmacy network in which a
significant number of listed participating providers are not accessible to
enrollees within a reasonable time frame or geographic distance;
(20) "Healthcare payor affiliate" means a pharmacy or pharmacist
that directly or indirectly, through one (1) or more intermediaries, owns or
controls, is owned or controlled by, or is under common ownership or control
04-01-2025 14:34:50 ANS087

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 H4/1/25 SB104
with a healthcare payor; and
(21)(A) "Self-administered prescription drug" means a
pharmaceutical that when prescribed does not require assistance by a third
party to administer and can be dispensed by a pharmacy or pharmacist to an
enrollee for self-administration under federal and state laws and
regulations.
(B) "Self-administered prescription drug" does not include
over-the-counter medications that do not require a prescription.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-92-506(b), concerning prohibited
practices under the Arkansas Pharmacy Benefits Manager Licensure Act, is
amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(9) Unless reviewed and approved by the commissioner in
coordination with the board, require pharmacy accreditation standards or
certification requirements inconsistent with, more stringent than, or in
addition to requirements of the board.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 92, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add additional sections to read as follows:
23-92-512. Unfair and deceptive trade practices.
(a)(1) A healthcare payor, healthcare payor affiliate, pharmacy
benefits manager, or pharmacy benefits manager affiliate shall not engage in
unfair or deceptive trade practices in the administration of pharmacy
benefits.
(2) Unfair or deceptive trade practices under subdivision (a)(1)
of this section include without limitation:
(A) Requiring an enrollee to utilize a particular
pharmacy benefits manager affiliate;
(B) Requiring a pharmacy or pharmacist to forward or
retransmit a prescription to a specific healthcare payor affiliate or
pharmacy benefits manager affiliate unless the receiving healthcare payor
affiliate or pharmacy benefits manager affiliate can provide verifiable
documentation of the enrollee's consent to use that specific pharmacy;
(C) Implementing a policy or protocol that unreasonably
restricts an enrollee's choice of pharmacy within a pharmacy benefits manager
network, if:
04-01-2025 14:34:50 ANS087

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 H4/1/25 SB104
(i)(a) The pharmacy meets the pharmacy benefits
manager network's relevant and reasonable terms of participation
requirements.
(b) A disagreement or concern regarding
whether relevant and reasonable terms of participation requirements are
relevant and reasonable shall be determined by the Insurance Commissioner;
and
(ii) The pharmacy has existing approval to dispense
one (1) or more self-administered prescription drugs in one (1) or more
pharmacy benefits manager networks for the underlying health benefit plan;
(D)(i) Providing an incentive or imposing a penalty that
effectively coerces or pressures an enrollee to use a particular healthcare
payor affiliate or pharmacy benefits manager affiliate.
(ii) Adjustments to an enrollee's cost-sharing
responsibilities, including copayments, coinsurance, or deductibles, that are
part of the health benefit plan's design are not considered incentives or
penalties under subdivision (a)(2)(D)(i) of this section;
(E) Failing to disclose to an enrollee the options
available for obtaining prescription drugs within the pharmacy benefits
manager network;
(F) Disclosing, sharing, or otherwise making available
enrollee information or enrollee-identifiable prescription information
submitted by a pharmacist or pharmacy to a healthcare payor affiliate or
pharmacy benefits manager affiliate without the written consent of the
enrollee;
(G) Using or disclosing enrollee information or enrollee-
identifiable prescription information for marketing or solicitation purposes
without the written consent of the enrollee; and
(H)(i) Engaging in any conduct that unlawfully restricts,
limits, or interferes with an enrollee's right to choose a pharmacy or
pharmacist, including without limitation actions that violate federal law or
state law or improperly steer enrollees to a specific pharmacy or pharmacist.
(ii) The prohibition under subdivision (a)(2)(H)(i)
of this section does not apply to a change in patient cost-sharing
obligations, including copayments, coinsurance, or deductibles, that are
permitted under applicable law.
04-01-2025 14:34:50 ANS087

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 H4/1/25 SB104
(b)(1) A healthcare payor, healthcare payor affiliate, pharmacy
benefits manager, or pharmacy benefits manager affiliate shall not impose
restrictive terms or conditions that limit an enrollee's or an enrollee’s
assigned representative’s rights to seek an exception to or to appeal a
coverage decision or restriction with his or her health benefit plan.
(2) A healthcare payor, healthcare payor affiliate, pharmacy
benefits manager, or pharmacy benefits manager affiliate shall ensure that:
(A) The processes for seeking an exception and filing an
appeal are clearly communicated to patients in a publicly accessible manner
on its website;
(B) The information necessary to utilize the processes
under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section is presented in a manner that is
understandable and not hidden or obscured; and
(C) An enrollee is not hindered or obstructed from
exercising the rights granted to the enrollee under the enrollee's health
benefit plan.
(c)(1) A healthcare payor shall not prohibit, restrict, or impede an
enrollee’s or an enrollee’s authorized representative’s ability to:
(A) Discuss the enrollee's health benefit plan, including
prescription drug benefits, with the healthcare payor or its authorized
representatives;
(B) Obtain necessary exceptions, approvals,
authorizations, or related information to access the enrollee's benefits; or
(C) Appeal decisions regarding the enrollee's benefits
coverage decisions as provided under the terms of the enrollee's health
benefit plan.
(2) The healthcare payor shall ensure that an enrollee has
reasonable access to the discussions, approvals, and appeals processes
regardless of the pharmacy benefits manager, affiliate, or third-party
administrator selected to administer prescription benefits.
(3) It is an unfair and deceptive trade practice for a
healthcare payor to delegate responsibilities in a manner that obstructs,
hinders, or prevents an enrollee from exercising the enrollee's rights under
his or her health benefit plan.
(d)(1) A pharmacy benefits manager and pharmacy benefits manager
affiliate shall adhere to all applicable federal and state privacy laws when
04-01-2025 14:34:50 ANS087

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 H4/1/25 SB104
communicating with an enrollee.
(2) A pharmacy benefits manager and pharmacy benefits manager
affiliate shall not use enrollee information for marketing purposes without
the written consent of the enrollee.
(e) A pharmacy benefits manager and pharmacy benefits manager
affiliate shall comply with the timely processing of complaints and appeals
as established by rule of the commissioner.
(f)(1) The commissioner may promulgate rules necessary to implement,
administer, and enforce this section.
(2) Rules that the commissioner may adopt under this section
include without limitation rules relating to implementing a penalty structure
for a healthcare payor, healthcare payor affiliate, pharmacy benefits
manager, or pharmacy benefits manager affiliate that fails to comply with
this section that is based on the number of Arkansas residents serviced by
the healthcare payor, healthcare payor affiliate, pharmacy benefits manager,
or pharmacy benefits manager affiliate.
(g)(1) A violation of this subchapter is an unfair and deceptive act
or practice as defined by the Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et
seq.
(2) All remedies, penalties, and authority granted to the
Attorney General under the Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.,
shall be available to the Attorney General for the enforcement of this
subchapter.

23-92-513. Prohibition of ghost networks.
(a)(1) A pharmacy benefits manager shall not create, utilize, or
maintain a ghost network within this state.
(2) For purposes of this section, a network shall not be
considered a ghost network if the network includes at least one (1) mail-
order pharmacy option and one (1) in-person pharmacy option that is
physically located in this state if both the mail-order pharmacy option and
the in-person pharmacy option are:
(A) Accepting new patients; and
(B) Otherwise available to an enrollee in this state.
(b)(1) A healthcare payor or pharmacy benefits manager shall not
create, utilize, or maintain a carve-out network within this state by:
04-01-2025 14:34:50 ANS087

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 H4/1/25 SB104
(A) Limiting enrollee access to specific pharmacies or
pharmacists for self-administered prescription drugs when an enrollee is
directed to use a healthcare payor affiliate, pharmacy benefits manager
affiliate, or other limited option while the pharmacy benefits manager
network appears to offer a full range of pharmacist services;
(B) Failing to provide adequate access to pharmacy services for
all covered self-administered prescription drugs, including through a
licensed pharmacy physically located within this state; or
(C) Representing that a broad network of pharmacies or
pharmacists is available if, in practice, access to certain self-administered
prescription drugs is restricted to a carve-out network that lacks sufficient
in-state providers accessible to an enrollee.
(2) For purposes of this section, a network shall not be
considered a carve-out network if the network includes at least one (1) mail-
order pharmacy option and one (1) in-person pharmacy option that is
physically located in this state if both the mail-order pharmacy option and
the in-person pharmacy option are:
(A) Accepting new patients; and
(B) Otherwise available to an enrollee in this state.
(c) A healthcare payor or pharmacy benefits manager shall ensure that
its pharmacy benefits manager network of participating pharmacists and
pharmacies:
(1) Accurately reflects the availability of pharmacists and
pharmacies actively accepting new patients;
(2) Provides an enrollee with reasonable access to pharmacist
services within this state, including options for in-person consultations and
medication pickup from a licensed pharmacist or pharmacy in this state;
(3) Is not solely serviced by a mail-order pharmacy; and
(4) Is not solely serviced by a pharmacy benefits manager
affiliate or healthcare payor affiliate.
(d) A healthcare payor or pharmacy benefits manager shall:
(1) Regularly verify and update its pharmacy benefits manager
network directory to reflect the current availability of participating
pharmacists and pharmacies;
(2) Remove a pharmacist or pharmacy from its pharmacy benefits
manager network directory if that pharmacist or pharmacy is:
04-01-2025 14:34:50 ANS087

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 H4/1/25 SB104
(A) Not accepting new patients;
(B) No longer in practice; or
(C) Otherwise unavailable to provide services; and
(3) Provide accurate and accessible information to an enrollee
regarding participating pharmacists and pharmacies within the pharmacy
benefits manager network in a publicly accessible manner on its website.
(e)(1) The Insurance Commissioner may promulgate rules necessary to
implement, administer, and enforce this section.
(2) Rules that the commissioner may adopt under this section
include without limitation rules relating to:
(A) Requiring a healthcare payor and pharmacy benefits
manager to submit periodic reports on pharmacy benefits manager network
adequacy and accessibility;
(B) Investigating a complaint regarding a ghost network
and taking appropriate enforcement action; and
(C) Implementing a penalty structure for a healthcare
payor or pharmacy benefits manager that fails to comply with this section
that:
(i) Is based on the number of Arkansas residents
serviced by the healthcare payor or pharmacy benefits manager; and
(ii) Does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) per violation.

23-92-514. Patient accommodation and nonrestriction clause.
(a) A healthcare payor or pharmacy benefits manager shall not enforce
the use of a particular healthcare payor affiliate or pharmacy benefits
manager affiliate without considering the enrollee's individual limitations,
including without limitation:
(1) Medical limitations, including chronic illnesses, temporary
or permanent disabilities, or conditions requiring specialized care or that
impair cognitive or motor functions;
(2) Complex therapies, when the self-administered prescription
drug is one (1) of multiple pharmaceuticals provided to an enrollee receiving
treatment and mailing the individual pharmaceutical has the potential to
interfere with the appropriate and timely administration requirements;
(3) Physical limitations, including mobility impairments or
04-01-2025 14:34:50 ANS087

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 H4/1/25 SB104
inability to retrieve mail or other deliveries without assistance or risk for
physical harm to self while retrieving mail or other deliveries;
(4) Socioeconomic limitations, including financial hardships,
lack of reliable transportation, lack of a caregiver, or other socioeconomic
barriers that may prohibit an enrollee from being present during delivery or
prohibit an enrollee from accessing the delivery location;
(5) Housing limitations, including homelessness, medical
confinement, incarceration, unstable housing situations, residences without
secure mail delivery options, or residences with shared mail facilities;
(6) Chain of custody, when a dispensing pharmacy cannot
guarantee that the recipient of the self-administered prescription drug will
be present according to federal and state laws and regulations;
(7) Prescribing provider order contradictions, when the
dispensing pharmacy is unable to guarantee that the prescribing provider's
orders will be followed if the self-administered prescription drug is
delivered, including situations in which the prescribing provider requires
administration under direct supervision of a medical professional for a
customarily self-administered prescription drug;
(8) Medication storage and efficacy concerns, when the
dispensing pharmacy is unable to guarantee that the enrollee will receive the
self-administered prescription drug in a timely fashion that does not
interfere with the environmental storage and transportation requirements
denoted by the manufacturer of the pharmaceutical; and
(9) Other relevant limitations, including mental health
conditions, cognitive or behavioral impairments, or any other factors that
impede or put at risk an enrollee's ability to receive, access, or administer
his or her self-administered prescription drugs.
(b)(1) An enrollee may obtain medications from a pharmacy of his or
her choice when healthcare payor affiliate services or pharmacy benefits
manager affiliate services are not suitable due to the limitations specified
under subsection (a) of this section.
(2) A healthcare payor or pharmacy benefits manager shall
facilitate access to in-person pharmacy services without imposing additional
costs or penalties on the enrollee.
(c) A healthcare payor or pharmacy benefits manager shall not mandate
the use of a healthcare payor affiliate or pharmacy benefits manager
04-01-2025 14:34:50 ANS087

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 H4/1/25 SB104
affiliate in cases in which use of a pharmacy benefits manager affiliate or
healthcare payor affiliate would adversely affect the enrollee's ability to
receive or administer his or her self-administered prescription drug safely
and effectively, considering the patient's individual circumstances under
subsection (a) of this section as determined by the enrollee's healthcare
provider.
(d) A healthcare payor and pharmacy benefits manager shall maintain
compliance in all dispensing practices with:
(1) The prescribing healthcare provider's orders; and
(2) All applicable federal and state laws regarding medication
dispensing and chain of custody.
(e) A healthcare payor or pharmacy benefits manager shall not
retaliate against an enrollee or healthcare provider for exercising his or
her rights under this section by:
(1) Increasing costs;
(2) Denying services; or
(3) Reporting to external agencies.
(f) A dispute arising from the enforcement of this section shall be
subject to a fair and prompt resolution process as defined by rule by the
Insurance Commissioner.
(g)(1) The commissioner may promulgate rules necessary to implement,
administer, and enforce this section.
(2) Rules that the commissioner may adopt under this section
include without limitation rules relating to:
(A) Resolving disputes that arise from enforcement of this
section through a fair and prompt resolution process; and
(B) Implementing a penalty structure for a healthcare
payor or pharmacy benefits manager that fails to comply with this section
that:
(i) Is based on the number of Arkansas residents
serviced by the healthcare payor or pharmacy benefits manager; and
(ii) Does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) per violation.

23-92-515. Self-administered prescription drug — Definition
controlling.
04-01-2025 14:34:50 ANS087

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 H4/1/25 SB104
(a) The definition of "self-administered prescription drug" under this
subchapter is controlling, and that defined term shall not be altered,
modified, reclassified, relabeled, or reinterpreted by a health benefit plan,
healthcare payor, healthcare payor affiliate, pharmacy benefits manager, or
pharmacy benefits manager affiliate.
(b) A classification, labeling, or interpretation by a health benefit
plan, healthcare payor, healthcare payor affiliate, pharmacy benefits
manager, or pharmacy benefits manager affiliate does not override or
supersede the definition of "self-administered prescription drug" under this
subchapter.

23-92-516. Violation of Deceptive Trade Practices Act —Enforcement —
Exclusions.
(a) A prohibition of an activity under this subchapter is applicable
to a person or entity that:
(1) Performs the prohibited activity;
(2) Causes another person or entity to perform the prohibited
activity;
(3) Solicits, advises, encourages, or coerces another person or
entity to perform the prohibited activity;
(4) Aids or attempts to aid another person or entity in
performing a prohibited activity; or
(5) Indirectly performs the prohibited activity.
(b)(1) This subchapter does not require a self-funded health benefit
plan to:
(A) Alter existing covered benefits of the self-funded
health benefit plan; or
(B) Modify underlying plan terms of the self-funded health
benefit plan.
(2) However, to the extent not preempted by federal law, this
section applies to the administration and business practices of pharmacy
benefits within the state, including without limitation the conduct of
pharmacy benefits managers and pharmacy benefits manager affiliates.
(c)(1) If a pharmacy benefits manager imposes or represents any
requirement or limitation as health-benefit-plan-imposed, the actual terms of
the underlying health benefit plan document shall control.
04-01-2025 14:34:50 ANS087

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 H4/1/25 SB104
(2) The plan sponsor shall retain the authority to interpret and
apply the health benefit plan sponsor's own health benefit plan’s terms to
the extent permitted by applicable federal and state law.
(d) If it is determined by the Insurance Commissioner that a pharmacy
benefits manager or pharmacy benefits manager affiliate is operating outside
the terms of the underlying health benefit plan, all dispute, enforcement,
and penalties under this subchapter shall apply and may be enforced by the
commissioner.
SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that an enrollee's access to
prescription medications is of immediate concern; that undue restrictions on
pharmacies and pharmacists hinder patient care; and that this act is
immediately necessary to protect an enrollee's rights and ensure timely
access to medications. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this
act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace,
health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/C. Penzo












04-01-2025 14:34:50 ANS087